Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2921
Liability for false information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act and filed by the Secretary of State contains false information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from a person that signed the record or caused another to sign it on the person's behalf and knew the information to be false at the time the record was signed.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 21.